Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.070

Trial—Proof must be taken.

The rights of the several parties, plaintiffs as well as defendants, may be put in issue, tried and determined in such suit, and where a defendant fails to answer, or where a sale of the property is necessary, the title shall be ascertained by proof to the satisfaction of the court, before the decree for partition or sale is given.

[Code 1881 s 558; 1877 p 118 s 563; 1869 p 134 s 511; RRS s 844.]